Massachusetts, session 194th, H861.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section one of Chapter fifty-one of the
General Laws, or any other general or special law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, residents of
the town of Sharon who are aliens lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United
States and who meet all qualifications for registering to vote except U.S. citizenship, may, upon
application, have their names entered on a register of qualified permanent resident alien voters
and may thereafter vote in any election for local offices, local ballot questions, and at Town
Meeting.
SECTION 2. The Sharon Select Board is authorized to formulate regulations and
guidelines to implement the purpose of this act.
of 2

SECTION 3. Nothing in this act shall be construed to confer upon permanent resident
aliens the right to vote for any state or federal office or any state or federal ballot question.
of 2